Utah statutes.
72-6-107.5.   Construction of improvements of highway -- Contracts -- Health
insurance coverage.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "Employee" means an "employee," "worker," or "operative" as defined in
Section 34A-2-104 who:
(i)  works at least 30 hours per calendar week; and
(ii)  meets employer eligibility waiting requirements for health care
insurance which may not exceed the first day of the calendar month following
90 days from the date of hire.
(b)  "Health benefit plan" has the same meaning as provided in Section
31A-1-301.
(c)  "Qualified health insurance coverage" means at the time the contract is
entered into or renewed:
(i)  a health benefit plan and employer contribution level with a combined
actuarial value at least actuarially equivalent to the combined actuarial
value of the benchmark plan determined by the Children's Health Insurance
Program under Subsection 26-40-106(2)(a), and a contribution level of 50% of
the premium for the employee and the dependents of the employee who reside or
work in the state, in which:
(A)  the employer pays at least 50% of the premium for the employee and the
dependents of the employee who reside or work in the state; and
(B)  for purposes of calculating actuarial equivalency under this Subsection
(1)(c)(i):
(I)  rather that the benchmark plan's deductible, and the benchmark plan's
out-of-pocket maximum based on income levels:
(Aa)  the deductible is $750 per individual and $2,250 per family; and
(Bb)  the out-of-pocket maximum is $3,000 per individual and $9,000 per
family;
(II)  dental coverage is not required; and
(III)  other than Subsection 26-40-106(2)(a), the provisions of Section
26-40-106 do not apply; or
(ii) (A)  is a federally qualified high deductible health plan that, at a
minimum, has a deductible that is either:
(I)  the lowest deductible permitted for a federally qualified high deductible
health plan; or
(II)  a deductible that is higher than the lowest deductible permitted for a
federally qualified high deductible health plan, but includes an employer
contribution to a health savings account in a dollar amount at least equal to
the dollar amount difference between the lowest deductible permitted for a
federally qualified high deductible plan and the deductible for the employer
offered federally qualified high deductible plan;
(B)  an out-of-pocket maximum that does not exceed three times the amount of
the annual deductible; and
(C)  under which the employer pays 75% of the premium for the employee and the
dependents of the employee who work or reside in the state.
(d)  "Subcontractor" has the same meaning provided for in Section 63A-5-208.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), this section applies to
contracts entered into by the department on or after July 1, 2009, for
construction or design of highways and to a prime contractor or to a
subcontractor in accordance with Subsection (2)(b).
(b) (i)  A prime contractor is subject to this section if the prime contract
is in the amount of $1,500,000 or greater.
(ii)  A subcontractor is subject to this section if a subcontract is in the
amount of $750,000 or greater.
(3)  This section does not apply if:
(a)  the application of this section jeopardizes the receipt of federal funds;
(b)  the contract is a sole source contract; or
(c)  the contract is an emergency procurement.
(4) (a)  This section does not apply to a change order as defined in Section
63G-6-102, or a modification to a contract, when the contract does not meet
the initial threshold required by Subsection (2).
(b)  A person who intentionally uses change orders or contract modifications
to circumvent the requirements of Subsection (2) is guilty of an infraction.
(5) (a)  A contractor subject to Subsection (2) shall demonstrate to the
department that the contractor has and will maintain an offer of qualified
health insurance coverage for the contractor's employees and the employees'
dependents during the duration of the contract.
(b)  If a subcontractor of the contractor is subject to Subsection (2), the
contractor shall demonstrate to the department that the subcontractor has and
will maintain an offer of qualified health insurance coverage for the
subcontractor's employees and the employees' dependents during the duration of
the contract.
(c) (i) (A)  A contractor who fails to meet the requirements of Subsection
(5)(a) during the duration of the contract is subject to penalties in
accordance with administrative rules adopted by the department under
Subsection (6).
(B)  A contractor is not subject to penalties for the failure of a
subcontractor to meet the requirements of Subsection (5)(b).
(ii) (A)  A subcontractor who fails to meet the requirements of Subsection
(5)(b) during the duration of the contract is subject to penalties in
accordance with administrative rules adopted by the department under
Subsection (6).
(B)  A subcontractor is not subject to penalties for the failure of a
contractor to meet the requirements of Subsection (5)(a).
(6)  The department shall adopt administrative rules:
(a)  in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act;
(b)  in coordination with:
(i)  the Department of Environmental Quality in accordance with Section
19-1-206;
(ii)  the Department of Natural Resources in accordance with Section 79-2-404;
(iii)  the State Building Board in accordance with Section 63A-5-205;
(iv)  the State Capitol Preservation Board in accordance with Section
63C-9-403;
(v)  a public transit district in accordance with Section 17B-2a-818.5; and
(vi)  the Legislature's Administrative Rules Review Committee; and
(c)  which establish:
(i)  the requirements and procedures a contractor must follow to demonstrate
to the department compliance with this section which shall include:
(A)  that a contractor will not have to demonstrate compliance with Subsection
(5)(a) or (b) more than twice in any 12-month period; and
(B)  that the actuarially equivalent determination required in Subsection (1)
is met by the contractor if the contractor provides the department or division
with a written statement of actuarial equivalency from either:
(I)  the Utah Insurance Department;
(II)  an actuary selected by the contractor or the contractor's insurer; or
(III)  an underwriter who is responsible for developing the employer group's
premium rates;
(ii)  the penalties that may be imposed if a contractor or subcontractor
intentionally violates the provisions of this section, which may include:
(A)  a three-month suspension of the contractor or subcontractor from entering
into future contracts with the state upon the first violation;
(B)  a six-month suspension of the contractor or subcontractor from entering
into future contracts with the state upon the second violation;
(C)  an action for debarment of the contractor or subcontractor in accordance
with Section 63G-6-804 upon the third or subsequent violation; and
(D)  monetary penalties which may not exceed 50% of the amount necessary to
purchase qualified health insurance coverage for an employee and a dependent
of the employee of the contractor or subcontractor who was not offered
qualified health insurance coverage during the duration of the contract; and
(iii)  a website on which the department shall post the benchmark for the
qualified health insurance coverage identified in Subsection (1)(c)(i).
(7) (a) (i)  In addition to the penalties imposed under Subsection (6), a
contractor or subcontractor who intentionally violates the provisions of this
section shall be liable to the employee for health care costs that would have
been covered by qualified health insurance coverage.
(ii)  An employer has an affirmative defense to a cause of action under
Subsection (7)(a)(i) if:
(A)  the employer relied in good faith on a written statement of actuarial
equivalency provided by:
(I)  an actuary; or
(II)  an underwriter who is responsible for developing the employer group's
premium rates; or
(B)  the department determines that compliance with this section is not
required under the provisions of Subsection (3) or (4).
(b)  An employee has a private right of action only against the employee's
employer to enforce the provisions of this Subsection (7).
(8)  Any penalties imposed and collected under this section shall be deposited
into the Medicaid Restricted Account created in Section 26-18-402.
(9)  The failure of a contractor or subcontractor to provide qualified health
insurance coverage as required by this section:
(a)  may not be the basis for a protest or other action from a prospective
bidder, offeror, or contractor under Section 63G-6-801 or any other provision
in Title 63G, Chapter 6, Part 8, Legal and Contractual Remedies; and
(b)  may not be used by the procurement entity or a prospective bidder,
offeror, or contractor as a basis for any action or suit that would suspend,
disrupt, or terminate the design or construction.
